Hawaii statutes.
§806-28 Characterization of the act.
The indictment need not allege that the offense was committed or the act done "feloniously",
"unlawfully", "wilfully", "knowingly", "maliciously",
"with force and arms", or otherwise except where such characterization
is used in the statutory definition of the offense. Where the characterization
is so used the indictment may employ the words of the statute or other words
substantially of the same import. In alleging the transaction the indictment
may use the nounal, adjectival, verbal, or adverbial form of the statutory name
of the offense. [L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4040; RL 1935, §5499; RL
1945, §10801; RL 1955, §258-11; HRS §711-28; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

As the plain language of §806-2 limits the application of the
criminal procedure provisions of this chapter to the circuit courts, the
appellate court erred by extending the application of this section to the
district courts. 127 H. 48, 276 P.3d 617 (2012).

See 35 H. 324 (1940); 37 H. 586 (1947).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next